Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 135B.3, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 135B.3 Licensure. 1. No A person or governmental unit, acting severally or jointly with any other person or governmental unit shall not establish, conduct, or maintain a hospital or rural emergency hospital in this state without a license. 2. A license shall not be issued or renewed under this chapter for an instrumentality of the government of the Peopleâs Republic of China, an individual who is a citizen of the Peopleâs Republic of China, or a business entity in which a majority interest is owned directly or indirectly by an instrumentality of the government of the Peopleâs Republic of China, or an individual who is a citizen of the Peopleâs Republic of China. 3. A license shall not be issued or renewed under this chapter for an instrumentality of the government of the Russian Federation, an individual who is a citizen of the Russian Federation, or a business entity in which a majority interest is owned directly or indirectly by an instrumentality of the Senate File 572, p. 2 government of the Russian Federation, or an individual who is a citizen of the Russian Federation. 4. A license shall not be issued or renewed under this chapter for an instrumentality of the government of the Democratic Peopleâs Republic of Korea, an individual who is a citizen of the Democratic Peopleâs Republic of Korea, or a business entity in which a majority interest is owned directly or indirectly by an instrumentality of the government of the Democratic Peopleâs Republic of Korea, or an individual who is a citizen of the Democratic Peopleâs Republic of Korea. Sec. 2. Section 135C.6, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1. a. A person or governmental unit acting severally or jointly with any other person or governmental unit shall not establish or operate a health care facility in this state without a license for the facility. b. A supported community living service, as defined in section 225C.21 , is not required to be licensed under this chapter , but is subject to approval under section 225C.21 in order to receive public funding. c. A license shall not be issued or renewed under this chapter for an instrumentality of the government of the Peopleâs Republic of China, an individual who is a citizen of the Peopleâs Republic of China, or a business entity in which a majority interest is owned directly or indirectly by an instrumentality of the government of the Peopleâs Republic of China, or an individual who is a citizen of the Peopleâs Republic of China. d. A license shall not be issued or renewed under this chapter for an instrumentality of the government of the Russian Federation, an individual who is a citizen of the Russian Federation, or a business entity in which a majority interest is owned directly or indirectly by an instrumentality of the government of the Russian Federation, or an individual who is a citizen of the Russian Federation. e. A license shall not be issued or renewed under this chapter for an instrumentality of the government of the Democratic Peopleâs Republic of Korea, an individual who is a citizen of the Democratic Peopleâs Republic of Korea, or a Senate File 572, p. 3 business entity in which a majority interest is owned directly or indirectly by an instrumentality of the government of the Democratic Peopleâs Republic of Korea, or an individual who is a citizen of the Democratic Peopleâs Republic of Korea. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 572, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor